Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article IX. Corporations.

§ 1. State Corporation Commission.

There shall be a permanent commission which shall be known as the State Corporation Commission and which shall consist of three members. The General Assembly may, by majority vote of the members elected to each house, increase the size of the Commission to no more than five members. Members of the Commission shall be elected by the General Assembly and shall serve for regular terms of six years. At least one member of the Commission shall have the qualifications prescribed for judges of courts of record, and any Commissioner may be impeached or removed in the manner provided for the impeachment or removal of judges of courts of record. The General Assembly may enact such laws as it deems necessary for the retirement of the Commissioners, with such conditions, compensation, and duties as it may prescribe. The General Assembly may also provide for the mandatory retirement of Commissioners after they reach a prescribed age, beyond which they shall not serve, regardless of the term to which elected or appointed. Whenever a vacancy in the Commission shall occur or exist when the General Assembly is in session, the General Assembly shall elect a successor for such unexpired term. If the General Assembly is not in session, the Governor shall forthwith appoint pro tempore a qualified person to fill the vacancy for a term ending thirty days after the commencement of the next regular session of the General Assembly, and the General Assembly shall elect a successor for such unexpired term.

The Commission shall annually elect one of its members chairman. Its subordinates and employees, and the manner of their appointment and removal, shall be as provided by law, except that its heads of divisions and assistant heads of divisions shall be appointed and subject to removal by the Commission.

Cross references.

As to powers and duties of Commission, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 2.

As to general provisions pertaining to the State Corporation Commission, see §§

12.1-1

through

12.1-5

.

As to employees of the Commission, see §§

12.1-18

through

12.1-24

.

As to procedure before the Commission, see §§

12.1-25

through

12.1-43

.

Law Review.

For article on the evolution of the State Corporation Commission, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 523 (1973).

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1975).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 7;
5A M.J. Counties, § 3;
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 3.

§ 2. Powers and duties of the Commission.

Subject to the provisions of this Constitution and to such requirements as may be prescribed by law, the Commission shall be the department of government through which shall be issued all charters, and amendments or extensions thereof, of domestic corporations and all licenses of foreign corporations to do business in this Commonwealth.

Except as may be otherwise prescribed by this Constitution or by law, the Commission shall be charged with the duty of administering the laws made in pursuance of this Constitution for the regulation and control of corporations doing business in this Commonwealth. Subject to such criteria and other requirements as may be prescribed by law, the Commission shall have the power and be charged with the duty of regulating the rates, charges, and services and, except as may be otherwise authorized by this Constitution or by general law, the facilities of railroad, telephone, gas, and electric companies.

The Commission shall in proceedings before it ensure that the interests of the consumers of the Commonwealth are represented, unless the General Assembly otherwise provides for representation of such interests.

The Commission shall have such other powers and duties not inconsistent with this Constitution as may be prescribed by law.

Cross references.

As to powers and duties of Commission generally, see §§

12.1-12

through

12.1-17

.

As to procedure before the Commission, see §§

12.1-25

through

12.1-43

.

As to foreign corporations, see §

13.1-757

et seq.

Law Review.

For note on public utility service charges, see 49 Va. L. Rev. 1161 (1963).

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For article on the evolution of the State Corporation Commission, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 523 (1973).

For article analyzing the financial barriers to public participation in the regulatory activities of the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 567 (1973).

For article, “Regulation of Electric Utilities by the State Corporation Commission,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 589 (1973).

For article analyzing rate-making issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1788 (1975).

For a special section on rate-making and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

For article, “From Animal Control to Zoning: 2019 Local Government Law Update,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 205 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 4, 23;
6B M.J. Drains, Sewers and Drainage Districts, § 7;
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 26;
13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 50;
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 2, 17-19, 22, 24, 29.;
15 M.J. Railroads, §§ 11, 37.

§ 3. Procedures of the Commission.

Before promulgating any general order, rule, or regulation, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of its contents.

In all matters within the jurisdiction of the Commission, it shall have the powers of a court of record to administer oaths, to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, to punish for contempt, and to enforce compliance with its lawful orders or requirements by adjudging and enforcing by its own appropriate process such fines or other penalties as may be prescribed or authorized by law. Before the Commission shall enter any finding, order, or judgment against a party it shall afford such party reasonable notice of the time and place at which he shall be afforded an opportunity to introduce evidence and be heard.

The Commission may prescribe its own rules of practice and procedure not inconsistent with those made by the General Assembly. The General Assembly shall have the power to adopt such rules, to amend, modify, or set aside the Commission’s rules, or to substitute rules of its own.

Law Review.

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For article on the evolution of the State Corporation Commission, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 523 (1973).

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 22;
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 17, 31.

§ 4. Appeals from actions of the Commission.

The Commonwealth, any party in interest, or any party aggrieved by any final finding, order, or judgment of the Commission shall have, of right, an appeal to the Supreme Court. The method of taking and prosecuting an appeal from any action of the Commission shall be prescribed by law or by the rules of the Supreme Court. All appeals from the Commission shall be to the Supreme Court only.

No other court of the Commonwealth shall have jurisdiction to review, reverse, correct, or annul any action of the Commission or to enjoin or restrain it in the performance of its official duties, provided, however, that the writs of mandamus and prohibition shall lie from the Supreme Court to the Commission.

Cross references.

As to appeals from the Corporation Commission, see §§

12.1-39

through

12.1-41

.

For rule of court dealing especially with appeals from the State Corporation Commission, see Rule 5:21.

Law Review.

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For article on the evolution of the State Corporation Commission, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 523 (1973).

For article analyzing the financial barriers to public participation in the regulatory activities of the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 567 (1973).

For article analyzing rate-making issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For an important decision involving this section, see the survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1975-1976, 62 Va. L. Rev. 1357 (1976).

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1A M.J. Administrative Law, §§ 16, 18;
1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 30;
3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 104, 107;
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 32-34.

§ 5. Foreign corporations.

No foreign corporation shall be authorized to carry on in this Commonwealth the business of, or to exercise any of the powers or functions of, a public service enterprise, or be permitted to do anything which domestic corporations are prohibited from doing, or be relieved from compliance with any of the requirements made of similar domestic corporations by the Constitution and laws of this Commonwealth. However, nothing in this section shall restrict the power of the General Assembly to enact such laws specially applying to foreign corporations as the General Assembly may deem appropriate.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions pertaining to foreign corporations, see §

13.1-757

et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3B M.J. Carriers, § 106;
4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 287, 296;
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 11.

§ 6. Corporations subject to general laws.

The creation of corporations, and the extension and amendment of charters whether heretofore or hereafter granted, shall be provided for by general law, and no charter shall be granted, amended, or extended by special act, nor shall authority in such matters be conferred upon any tribunal or officer, except to ascertain whether the applicants have, by complying with the requirements of the law, entitled themselves to the charter, amendment, or extension applied for and to issue or refuse the same accordingly. Such general laws may be amended, repealed, or modified by the General Assembly. Every corporation chartered in this Commonwealth shall be deemed to hold its charter and all amendments thereof under the provisions of, and subject to all the requirements, terms, and conditions of, this Constitution and any laws passed in pursuance thereof. The police power of the Commonwealth to regulate the affairs of corporations, the same as individuals, shall never be abridged.

Cross references.

As to limitations placed upon General Assembly when dealing with corporations, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14, subdivisions (17) through (20).

As to formation of corporations, see §

13.1-618

et seq.

As to amendments of articles of incorporation, see §

13.1-705

et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3A M.J. Banks and Banking, § 9;
4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 14, 30, 32, 113;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, §§ 73, 75, 112;
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 29.

§ 7. Exclusions from term “corporation” or “company.”

The term “corporation” or “company” as used in this Article shall exclude all municipal corporations, other political subdivisions, and public institutions owned or controlled by the Commonwealth.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4B M.J. Corporations, § 14;
15 M.J. Railroads, § 2.